District of Columbia statutes.
1-327.56

Coordination with agencies.

The Office shall enter into memoranda of understanding with the agencies, as necessary, to define the Office’s obligations to the agencies, and associated procedures and performance standards, with respect to custody and sharing of data generated in the operations of the Office, support for the agencies’ dispatch operations and priorities, production of radio transmission transcripts, the provision of customer service to the hearing impaired, and such other matters as the Office and the agencies deem appropriate.

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 3207, 51 DCR 8441

History